District of Columbia statutes.
7-2271.06

Records.

All records and information obtained by the Commission pursuant to this subchapter shall be destroyed by the Commission one year after publication of the Commission’s annual report.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 206, 54 DCR 794